Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Subchapter 2. Certificates of Title

§ 2011.
Certificate of origin.

When a new vehicle is delivered in this State by the manufacturer to his or her agent or his or her franchised dealer, the manufacturer shall execute and deliver to his or her agent or his or her franchised dealer a certificate of origin in the form prescribed by the Commissioner, and no person shall bring into this State any new vehicle unless he or she has in his or her possession the certificate of origin as prescribed by the Commissioner. The certificate of origin shall contain the manufacturer’s vehicle identification number of the motor vehicle, the name of the manufacturer, the make of the vehicle, the model year, number of cylinders, a general description of the body, if any, and the type of model. When a new vehicle is sold in this State, the manufacturer, his or her agent, or his or her franchised dealer shall execute and deliver to the purchaser, in case of an absolute sale, assignment of the certificate of origin or if other than absolute sale, assignment of the certificate of origin subject to contract, signed or executed by the manufacturer, his or her agent, or his or her dealer, with the genuine names and business or residence addresses of both stated thereon, and certified to have been executed with full knowledge of the contents and with the consent of both purchaser and seller. For good cause shown, the Commissioner may accept any other satisfactory evidence of the information required under this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 297

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971; amended

1983, No. 60

, § 3;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 212.

§ 2012.
Exempted vehicles.

No certificate of title need be obtained for:

a vehicle owned by the United States, unless it is registered in this State;

a vehicle owned by a manufacturer or dealer and held for sale, even though incidentally moved on the highway or used for purposes of testing or demonstration, or used by an educational institution approved by the Agency of Education for driver training purposes, or a vehicle used by a manufacturer solely for testing;

a vehicle owned by a nonresident of this State and not required by law to be registered in this State;

a vehicle regularly engaged in the interstate transportation of persons or property for which a currently effective certificate of title has been issued in another state;

a self-propelled wheelchair or invalid tricycle;

a motorcycle that has less than 300 cubic centimeters of engine displacement or a motorcycle powered by electricity with less than 20 kilowatts of engine power;

any trailer with an unladened weight of 1,500 pounds or less;

a motor-driven cycle;

any other type of vehicle designed primarily for off-highway use and deemed exempt by the Commissioner; or

a vehicle that is more than 15 years old.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 297

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971; amended

1971, No. 54

, § 1, eff. April 14, 1971;

1977, No. 20

, § 11;

1983, No. 60

, § 7;

2009, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 19k, eff. Sept. 1, 2010;

2011, No. 46

, § 11;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 269, eff. Feb. 14, 2014;

2015, No. 50

, § 33a, eff. Jan. 1, 2016.

§ 2013.
When certificate required; issuance of exempt vehicle title upon request.

Except as provided in section 2012 of this title, the provisions of this chapter shall apply to and a title must be obtained for all motor vehicles at the time of first registration or when a change of registration is required under the provisions of section 321 of this title by reason of a sale for consideration.
(a) (1) Except as provided in section 2012 of this title, the provisions of this chapter shall apply to and a title must be obtained for all motor vehicles at the time of first registration or when a change of registration is required under the provisions of section 321 of this title by reason of a sale for consideration.

In addition, a Vermont resident may apply at any time to the Commissioner to obtain an “exempt vehicle title” for a vehicle that is more than 15 years old. Such titles shall be in a form prescribed by the Commissioner and shall include a legend indicating that the title is issued under the authority of this subdivision. The Commissioner shall issue an exempt vehicle title if the applicant pays the applicable fee and fulfills the requirements of this section, and if the Commissioner is satisfied that:

the applicant is the owner of the vehicle;

the applicant is a Vermont resident; and

the vehicle is not subject to any liens or encumbrances.

Prior to issuing an exempt vehicle title pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection, the Commissioner shall require all of the following:

The applicant to furnish one of the following proofs of ownership, in order of preference:

a previous Vermont or out-of-state title indicating the applicant’s ownership;

an original or a certified copy of a previous Vermont or out-of-state registration indicating the applicant’s ownership;

sufficient evidence of ownership as determined by the Commissioner, including bills of sale or original receipts for major components of homebuilt vehicles; or

a notarized affidavit certifying that the applicant is the owner of the vehicle and is unable to produce the proofs listed in subdivisions (i)-(iii) of this subdivision (3)(A) despite reasonable efforts to do so.

A notarized affidavit certifying:

the date the applicant purchased or otherwise took ownership of the vehicle;

the name and address of the seller or transferor, if known;

that the applicant is a Vermont resident; and

that the vehicle is not subject to any liens or encumbrances.

Assignment of a new vehicle identification number pursuant to section 2003 of this title, if the vehicle does not have one.

The Commissioner shall not require an application for a certificate of title upon the renewal of the registration of a vehicle.

The Commissioner shall note on the face of the registration of each vehicle for which a certificate of title has been issued a statement to that effect.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 297

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971; amended

1971, No. 54

, § 2, eff. April 14, 1971;

1995, No. 112

(Adj. Sess.), § 14, eff. Sept. 1, 1996;

2015, No. 50

, § 33a, eff. Jan. 1, 2016;

2019, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. July 13, 2020.

§ 2014.
Repealed.
1971, No. 54, § 3, eff. April 14, 1971.

§ 2015.
Application for certificate.

The application for the first certificate of title of a vehicle in this State shall be made by the owner to the Commissioner on the form he or she prescribes and shall contain:

the name, residence, and mail address of the owner;

a description of the vehicle, including, so far as the following data exist, its make, model, identification number, odometer reading, or hubometer reading or clock meter reading on all vehicles, type of body, the number of cylinders, and whether new or used;

the date of purchase by the applicant, the name and address of the person from whom the vehicle was acquired, and the names and addresses of any lienholders in the order of their priority and the dates of their security agreements and, if a new vehicle, the application shall be accompanied by a manufacturer’s or importer’s certificate of origin;

any further information the Commissioner reasonably requires to identify the vehicle and to enable him or her to determine whether the owner is entitled to a certificate of title and the existence or nonexistence of security interests in the vehicle.

[Repealed.]

If the application refers to a vehicle purchased from a dealer, it shall contain the name and address of any lienholder holding a security interest created or reserved at the time of the sale and the date of his or her security agreement and be signed by the dealer as well as the owner, and the dealer shall promptly mail or deliver the application to the Commissioner unless title is in the possession of a lienholder at the time of sale, in which case the dealer shall have until 30 calendar days after the date the dealer acquired the vehicle to mail or deliver the application to the Commissioner. The dealer shall not be entitled to the extension if the lien on the vehicle was granted by the dealer to finance vehicle inventory acquisition.

If the application refers to a vehicle last previously registered in another state or country, the application shall contain or be accompanied by:

any certificate of title issued by the other state or country;

any other information and documents the Commissioner reasonably requires to establish the ownership of the vehicle and the existence or nonexistence of security interests in it; and

any other proof of the identity of the vehicle the Commissioner reasonably requires.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 297

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971; amended

1983, No. 60

, § 8;

1983, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1985;

1995, No. 19

, § 12, eff. April 17, 1995;

2019, No. 60

, § 19;

2021, No. 76

, § 5, eff. April 1, 2020.

§ 2016.
Commissioner to check identification number.

The Commissioner, upon receiving application for a first certificate of title or exempt vehicle title, shall check the identification number of the vehicle shown in the application against the records of vehicles required to be maintained by section 2017 of this title and against the record of stolen and converted vehicles required to be maintained by section 2084 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 297

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971;

2015, No. 50

, § 33a, eff. Jan. 1, 2016.

§ 2017.
Issuance of certificate; records.

The Commissioner shall file each application received and, when satisfied as to its genuineness and regularity and that the applicant is entitled to the issuance of a certificate of title, shall issue a certificate of title of the vehicle.

The Commissioner shall maintain at his or her central office a record of all certificates of title issued by him or her for vehicles 15 years old and newer, and of all exempt vehicle titles issued by him or her, under a distinctive title number assigned to the vehicle; under the identification number of the vehicle; alphabetically, under the name of the owner; and, in the discretion of the Commissioner, by any other method he or she determines. The original records may be maintained on microfilm or electronic imaging.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 297

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971; amended

1979, No. 187

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1983, No. 60

, § 4;

1991, No. 165

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2009, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 16;

2015, No. 50

, § 33a, eff. Jan. 1, 2016.

§ 2018.
Information on certificate.

Each certificate of title issued by the Commissioner shall contain:

The date issued.

The name and address of the owner.

The names and addresses of any lienholders, in the order of priority as shown on the application or, if the application is based on a certificate of title, as shown on the certificate; however, no more than two lienholders may appear on a certificate. In the event that there are more than two lienholders on the vehicle, the certificate of title shall contain an appropriate legend as determined by the Commissioner.

The title number assigned to the vehicle.

A description of the vehicle, including, so far as the following data exist, its make, model, identification number, odometer reading, or hubometer reading or clock meter reading on all vehicles, type of body, number of cylinders, whether new or used, and, if a new vehicle, the date of the first sale of the vehicle for use.

Any other data the Commissioner prescribes.

Unless a bond is filed as provided in subdivision 2020(2) of this title, a distinctive certificate of title shall be issued for a vehicle last previously registered in another state or country the laws of which do not require that lienholders be named on a certificate of title to perfect their security interests. The certificate shall contain an appropriate legend as determined by the Commissioner and may contain any other information the Commissioner prescribes. If no notice of a security interest in the vehicle is received by the Commissioner within four months from the issuance of the distinctive certificate of title, he or she shall, upon application and surrender of the distinctive certificate, issue a certificate of title in ordinary form.

The certificate of title shall contain forms for assignment and warranty of title by the owner and for assignment and warranty of title by a dealer, and may contain forms for applications for a certificate of title by a transferee, the naming of a lienholder, and the assignment or release of the security interest of a lienholder.

A certificate of title issued by the Commissioner is prima facie evidence of the facts appearing on it.

A certificate of title for a vehicle is not subject to garnishment, attachment, execution, or other judicial process, but this subsection does not prevent a lawful levy upon the vehicle.

If a vehicle has been returned to the manufacturer after final determination, adjudication, or settlement pursuant to the provisions of 9 V.S.A. chapter 115 or after final determination, adjudication, or settlement under similar laws of any other state, any certificate of title for the vehicle shall contain an appropriate legend as determined by the Commissioner.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 297

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971; amended

1983, No. 60

, § 5;

1983, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1985;

1999, No. 18

, § 34, eff. May 13, 1999;

2015, No. 50

, § 17.

§ 2019.
Mailing or delivering certificate.

The certificate of title shall be mailed or personally delivered, upon proper identification of the individual, to the first lienholder named in it or, if none, to the owner. However, a person is entitled to a personal delivery of only one title in a single day and of no more than three titles in a calendar month.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 297

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971; amended

1979, No. 10

;

2015, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 75.

§ 2020.
Withholding of certificate; bond required.

If the Commissioner is not satisfied as to the ownership of the vehicle or that there are no undisclosed security interests in it, the Commissioner may register the vehicle but shall either:

Withhold issuance of a certificate of title until the applicant presents documents reasonably sufficient to satisfy the Commissioner as to the applicant’s ownership of the vehicle and that there are no undisclosed security interests in it; or

As a condition of issuing a certificate of title, require the applicant to file with the Commissioner a bond in the form prescribed by the Commissioner and executed by the applicant, and either accompanied by the deposit of cash with the Commissioner or also executed by a person authorized to conduct a surety business in this State. The bond shall be in an amount equal to one and one-half times the value of the vehicle as determined by the Commissioner and conditioned to indemnify any prior owner and lienholder and any subsequent purchaser of the vehicle or person acquiring any security interest in it, and their respective successors in interest, against any expense, loss, or damage, including reasonable attorney’s fees, by reason of the issuance of the certificate of title of the vehicle or on account of any defect in or undisclosed security interest upon the right, title, and interest of the applicant in and to the vehicle. Any such interested person has a right of action to recover on the bond for any breach of its conditions, but the aggregate liability of the surety to all persons shall not exceed the amount of the bond. The bond, and any deposit accompanying it, shall be returned at the end of three years or earlier if the vehicle is no longer registered in this State and the currently valid certificate of title is surrendered to the Commissioner, unless the Commissioner has been notified of the pendency of an action to recover on the bond.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 297

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971; amended

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 213.

§ 2021.
Refusal of certificate.

The Commissioner shall refuse issuance of a certificate of title or an exempt vehicle title if any required fee is not paid or if he or she has reasonable grounds to believe that:

the applicant is not the owner of the vehicle;

the application contains a false or fraudulent statement; or

the applicant fails to furnish required information or documents or any additional information the Commissioner reasonably requires.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 297

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971; amended

2015, No. 50

, § 33a, eff. Jan. 1, 2016.

§ 2022.
Duplicate certificate.

If a certificate is lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed or becomes illegible, the first lienholder or, if none, the owner or legal representative of the owner named in the certificate, as shown by the records of the Commissioner, shall promptly make application for and may obtain a duplicate upon furnishing information satisfactory to the Commissioner. It shall be mailed to the first lienholder named in it or, if none, to the owner.

[Repealed.]

A person recovering an original certificate of title for which a duplicate has been issued shall promptly surrender the original certificate to the Commissioner.

When a duplicate certificate of title is issued, the Commissioner shall cause the original certificate of title for that vehicle to be revoked.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 297

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971; amended

1983, No. 60

, § 9;

1985, No. 106

(Adj. Sess.);

2015, No. 50

, § 18.

§ 2023.
Transfer of interest in vehicle.

If an owner transfers his or her interest in a vehicle, other than by the creation of a security interest, he or she shall, at the time of delivery of the vehicle, execute an assignment and warranty of title to the transferee in the space provided therefor on the certificate or as the Commissioner prescribes, and of the odometer reading or hubometer reading or clock meter reading of the vehicle at the time of delivery in the space provided therefor on the certificate, and cause the certificate and assignment to be mailed or delivered to the transferee or to the Commissioner. Where title to a vehicle is in the name of more than one person, the nature of the ownership must be indicated by one of the following on the certificate of title:

TEN ENT (tenants by the entirety);

JTEN (joint tenants);

TEN COM (tenants in common);

PTNRS (partners); or

TOD (transfer on death).

Upon request of the owner or transferee, a lienholder in possession of the certificate of title shall, unless the transfer was a breach of his or her security agreement, either deliver the certificate to the transferee for delivery to the Commissioner or, upon receipt of notice from the transferee of the owner’s assignment, the transferee’s application for a new certificate, and the required fee, mail or deliver the certificate, application, and fee to the Commissioner. The delivery of the certificate does not affect the rights of the lienholder under his or her security agreement. If a dealer accepts a vehicle with a preexisting security interest as part of the consideration for a sale or trade from the dealer, the dealer shall mail or otherwise tender payment to satisfy the security interest within five days of the sale or trade.

If a security interest is reserved or created at the time of the transfer, the certificate of title shall be retained by or delivered to the person who becomes the lienholder, and the parties shall comply with the provisions of section 2043 of this title.

Except as provided in section 2024 of this title and as between the parties, a transfer by an owner is not effective until the provisions of this section and section 2026 of this title have been complied with; however, an owner who has delivered possession of the vehicle to the transferee and has complied with the provisions of this section and section 2026 of this title requiring action by him or her is not liable as owner for any damages thereafter resulting from operation of the vehicle.

Notwithstanding other provisions of the law, whenever the estate of an individual who dies intestate consists principally of an automobile, the surviving spouse shall be deemed to be the owner of the motor vehicle and title to the same shall automatically and by virtue hereof pass to the surviving spouse. Upon request, the Department shall register and title the vehicle in the name of the surviving spouse, and no fee shall be assessed. This transaction is exempt from the provisions of the purchase and use tax on motor vehicles.

Notwithstanding other provisions of the law, and except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, whenever the estate of an individual consists in whole or in part of a motor vehicle, and the person’s will or other testamentary document does not specifically address disposition of motor vehicles, the surviving spouse shall be deemed to be the owner of the motor vehicle and title to the motor vehicle shall automatically pass to the surviving spouse. Upon request, the Department shall register and title the vehicle in the name of the surviving spouse, and no fee shall be assessed. This transaction is exempt from the provisions of the purchase and use tax on motor vehicles.

This subsection shall apply to no more than two motor vehicles, and shall not apply if the motor vehicle is titled in the name of one or more persons other than the decedent and the surviving spouse.

Where the title identifies a person who will become the owner upon the death of the principal owner (transfer on death), the principal owner shall have all rights of ownership and rights of transfer until his or her death. The designated transferee shall have no rights of ownership until such time as the principal owner has died as established by a valid death certificate. At that time, the transferee shall become the owner of the vehicle subject to any existing security interests.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 297

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971; amended

1975, No. 71

, § 2, eff. April 17, 1975;

1983, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1985;

1983, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1985;

1989, No. 51

, § 46;

2001, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), § 28, eff. May 15, 2002;

2007, No. 39

, § 1;

2009, No. 55

, § 6;

2011, No. 46

, § 13;

2015, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 45.

§ 2024.
Resale by dealer.

If a dealer buys a vehicle, holds it for resale, and obtains the certificate of title from the owner or the lienholder, then the certificate need not be sent to the Commissioner. When the dealer transfers the vehicle to a person, other than by the creation of a security interest, he or she shall simultaneously execute the assignment and warranty of title by filling in the spaces on the certificate of title or as prescribed by the Commissioner or, if title is held by a finance source, execute a form prescribed by the Commissioner that provides proof of the transfer but does not release the lien. The certificate shall be mailed or delivered to the Commissioner with the transferee’s application for a new certificate.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 297

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971; amended

2001, No. 69

, § 5;

2019, No. 60

, § 20.

§ 2025.
Involuntary transfers.

If the interest of an owner in a vehicle passes to another other than by voluntary transfer, the transferee shall, except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, promptly mail or deliver to the Commissioner the last certificate of title, if available, proof of the transfer, and his or her application for a new certificate in the form the Commissioner prescribes.

If the interest of the owner is terminated or the vehicle is sold under a security agreement by a lienholder named in the certificate of title, the transferee shall promptly mail or deliver to the Commissioner the last certificate of title, his or her application for a new certificate in the form the Commissioner prescribes, and an affidavit made by or on behalf of the lienholder that the vehicle was repossessed and that the interest of the owner was lawfully terminated or sold pursuant to the terms of the security agreement. If the lienholder succeeds to the interest of the owner and holds the vehicle for resale, he or she need not secure a new certificate of title but, upon transfer to another person, shall promptly mail or deliver to the transferee or to the Commissioner the certificate, affidavit, and other documents required to be sent to the Commissioner by the transferee.

A person holding a certificate of title whose interest in the vehicle has been extinguished or transferred other than by voluntary transfer shall mail or deliver the certificate to the Commissioner upon request of the Commissioner. The delivery of the certificate pursuant to the request of the Commissioner does not affect the rights of the person surrendering the certificate, and the action of the Commissioner in issuing a new certificate of title is not conclusive upon the rights of an owner or lienholder named in the old certificate.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 297

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971; amended

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 214.

§ 2026.
Fee to accompany applications.

An application for a certificate of title shall be accompanied by the required fee when mailed or delivered to the Commissioner.

An application for the naming of a lienholder or his or her assignee on a certificate of title shall be accompanied by the required fee when mailed or delivered to the Commissioner.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 297

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

§ 2027.
Issuance of new certificate.

The Commissioner, upon receipt of a properly assigned certificate of title, with an application for a new certificate of title, the required fee, and any other documents required by law, shall issue a new certificate of title in the name of the transferee as owner and mail to the first lienholder named in it or, if none, to the owner.

The Commissioner, upon receipt of an application for a new certificate of title by a transferee other than by voluntary transfer, with proof of the transfer, the required fee, and any other documents required by law, shall issue a new certificate of title in the name of the transferee as owner. If the outstanding certificate of title is not delivered to him or her, the Commissioner shall make demand therefor from the holder thereof.

The Commissioner shall file and retain for five years every surrendered certificate of title so as to permit the tracing of title of the corresponding vehicles.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 297

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971; amended

1979, No. 187

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2011, No. 46

, § 20;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 215.

§ 2028.
Repealed.
1983, No. 60, § 11(1).

§ 2029.
Suspension or revocation of certificate.

The Commissioner shall suspend or revoke a certificate of title or exempt vehicle title, upon notice and reasonable opportunity to be heard in accordance with section 2004 of this chapter, if he or she finds:

the certificate of title or exempt vehicle title was fraudulently procured or erroneously issued; or

the vehicle has been scrapped, dismantled, or destroyed.

Suspension or revocation of a certificate of title does not, in itself, affect the validity of a security interest noted on it.

When the Commissioner suspends or revokes a certificate of title or exempt vehicle title, the owner or person in possession of it shall, immediately upon receiving notice of the suspension or revocation, mail or deliver the certificate to the Commissioner.

The Commissioner may seize and impound any certificate of title or exempt vehicle title which has been canceled, suspended, or revoked.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 297

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971; amended

2001, No. 69

, § 6;

2015, No. 50

, § 33a, eff. Jan. 1, 2016.